Idaho, session 2025, S1162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6539, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6539. LIMITATIONS ON REGULATION OF SHORT-TERM RENTALS AND VACATION
RENTALS. (1) Neither a county nor a city may enact or enforce any ordinance
that has the express or practical effect of prohibiting any type of short-
term rentals or vacation rentals in the county or city. A county or city may
implement such reasonable regulations as it deems are necessary to safeguard
the public health, and safety and general welfare in order to protect the in-
tegrity of residential neighborhoods in which short-term rentals or vaca-
tion rentals operate as long as the reasonable regulations do not impose dif-
ferent restrictions or obligations on the short-term rentals than are im-
posed on single family dwellings or similar structures not used as short-
term rentals. A short-term rental or vacation rental shall be classified as
a non-transient residential land use for zoning and building code purposes
and be subject to all zoning requirements applicable thereto and to those
building codes adopted by the Idaho building code board.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Different restrictions or obligations" means any requirement or
regulation that would not be required or regulated but for the prop-
erty's use as a short-term rental and specifically includes but is not
limited to: requiring owner occupation for any amount of time; requir-
ing professional property management; requiring additional insurance;
reporting of use or other statistics; requiring additional fire pro-
tection or fire sprinklers; requiring additional or improved means of
ingress and egress; requiring additional parking; requiring modifica-
tion to the physical structure of the property; requiring inspections;
requiring internal or external signage, notices, or diagrams; re-
stricting the number of short-term rentals in a county or city; limiting
proximity to other short-term rentals; imposing a limit on the days a
property can be rented; requiring notices to neighboring properties;
requiring a conditional use permit in a residential zone; requiring
increased sewer or other utility capacity; or requiring the property
to be improved to meet current building codes unless the same would be
required without regard to the short-term rental use; and
(b) The terms defined in section 63-1803, Idaho Code, shall apply.


(3) All short-term rental properties and owners shall be subject to all
other county and city ordinances and penalties that apply to other residen-
tial uses, including but not limited to noise, parking, nuisance, curfew,
and traffic regulations and similar regulations.
(2) (4) Neither a county nor a city can regulate the operation of a
short-term rental marketplace as prohibited by chapter 18, title 63, Idaho
Code.
(5) Nothing in this section shall prevent a county or city from requir-
ing, by ordinance, a business license to operate a short-term rental as long
as the licensing ordinance does not impose requirements prohibited by this
section.
(a) A county or city may only require that an applicant for a business
license for a short-term rental property submit:
(i) Payment of an annual fee for each property pursuant to section
63-1311, Idaho Code;
(ii) A statement by the property owner certifying that within
the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the applica-
tion for a license, there have not been a combined total of three
(3) or more convictions on three (3) or more separate occasions
by the property owner, property manager, or prior occupants for
violating ordinances or laws relating to such short-term rental
property; or
(iii) Both the payment and statement pursuant to this paragraph.
(b) A county or city may revoke a business license for a short-term
rental property if:
(i) A license holder does not provide payment of the annual li-
cense fee if required by a county or city ordinance adopted pur-
suant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(ii) Within a twelve (12) month period there are a combined to-
tal of three (3) or more convictions, on three (3) or more separate
occasions, by the property owner, property manager, or occupants
for violating ordinances or laws related to such short-term rental
property.
(6) The owner or operator of a short-term rental shall disclose to
prospective tenants prior to renting the short-term rental if the short-term
rental is equipped with:
(a) An operating smoke alarm in every room advertised as a sleeping
area;
(b) An operating fire extinguisher on every floor;
(c) A first aid kit; and
(d) For all basement or below-grade rooms advertised as sleeping areas,
a means of egress directly to the exterior of the building that is a min-
imum of thirty (30) inches wide by thirty (30) inches tall.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.